Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1566XS (3) 91 cm/jh S.F. 189 Section 1. Section 147.136A, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. The limitation on damages contained in this section shall 3 not apply as to a defendant if that any of the following are 4 true: 5 a. That defendantâs actions constituted actual malice. 6 b. That defendantâs action is sexual in nature regardless of 7 either of the following: 8 (1) The act was committed under auspice of providing 9 professional diagnosis, counseling, or treatment. 10 (2) At the time the act occurred, the patient believed the 11 act was for medically or professionally appropriate diagnosis, 12 counseling, or treatment. 13